North Dakota, session 69, SB2054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 27-09.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
27-09.1-05. Master list.
1. The clerk for each county shall compile and maintain a master list consisting of all lists
of actual:
a. Actual voters for the county supplemented with names from other lists of persons
resident therein, such as lists of utility customers, property taxpayers, motor
vehicle registrations, tribal registries if made available by a federally recognized
Indian tribe in this state, and driver's licenses, which the supreme court of this
state from time to time designates. In compiling the master list, the clerk shall
avoid duplication of names.;
b. Those receiving unemployment compensation under chapter 52 - 06 ;
c. Registered owners of motor vehicles under chapter 39 - 04 ;
d. Drivers licensed by the department of transportation under chapter 39 - 06 ;
e. Public utility customers;
f. Property taxpayers; and
g. Tribal registries if made available by a federally recognized Indian tribe in this
state.
2. Whoever has custody, possession, or control of any of the lists making up or used in
compiling the master list, including those designated under subsection 1 by the
supreme court as supplementary sources of names, shall make the list available to the
Page No. 1 25.8027.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
clerk for inspection, reproduction, and copying at all reasonable times to the court in
electronic form.
3. Names on tribal registries must be included in the master list if made available by a
federally recognized Indian tribe in this state.
4. The master list shall be open to the public for examinationand all lists used to compile
the master list are confidential and are to be used only by the court for the purpose of
jury selection.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 27-09.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
27-09.1-05. Master list.
1. The clerk for each county shall compile and maintain a master list consisting of:
a. Actual voters for the county;
b. Those receiving public assistance under North Dakota Administrative Code
chapter 75-02-01.2;
c. Those receiving child care assistance under North Dakota Administrative Code
chapter 75-02-01.3;
d. Those receiving unemployment compensation under chapter 52-06;
c.e. Registered owners of motor vehicles under chapter 39-04;
d.f. Drivers licensed by the department of transportation under chapter 39-06;
e.g. Public utility customers;
f.h. Property taxpayers; and
g.i. Tribal registries if made available by a federally recognized Indian tribe in this
state.
2. Whoever has custody, possession, or control of any of the lists making up or used in
compiling the master list shall make the list available to the court in electronic form.
3. Names on tribal registries must be included in the master list if made available by a
federally recognized Indian tribe in this state.
4. The master list and all lists used to compile the master list are confidential and are to
be used only by the court for the purpose of jury selection.
SECTION 3. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - STATE PLAN
AMENDMENT. During the 2025-2027 biennium the department of health and human services
Page No. 2 25.8027.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
shall seek a state plan amendment to authorize the disclosure of lists of those individuals
receiving public assistance under North Dakota Administrative Code chapter 75-02-01.2 and
child care assistance under North Dakota Administrative Code chapter 75-02-01.3. Upon
amendment of the state plan, the executive director of the department of health and human
services shall certify this fact to the legislative council.
SECTION 4. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this Act becomes effective
ninety days after the date the executive director of the department of health and human
services certifies to the legislative council the state has been granted a state plan amendment
that authorizes the disclosure of lists of those individuals receiving public assistance under
North Dakota Administrative Code chapter 75-02-01.2 and child care assistance under North
Dakota Administrative Code chapter 75-02-01.3.
Page No. 3 25.8027.01000